Dictionaries/DEUTSCH/DEUTSCH.AFF
#
# $Id: deutsch.7bit,v 1.7 1994/10/25 05:46:42 geoff Exp $
#
# Copyright 1988, 1989, 1992, 1993, Geoff Kuenning, Granada Hills, CA
# All rights reserved.
#
# Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without
# modification, are permitted provided that the following conditions
# are met:
#
# 1. Redistributions of source code must retain the above copyright
#    notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer.
# 2. Redistributions in binary form must reproduce the above copyright
#    notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer in the
#    documentation and/or other materials provided with the distribution.
# 3. All modifications to the source code must be clearly marked as
#    such.  Binary redistributions based on modified source code
#    must be clearly marked as modified versions in the documentation
#    and/or other materials provided with the distribution.
# 4. All advertising materials mentioning features or use of this software
#    must display the following acknowledgment:
#      This product includes software developed by Geoff Kuenning and
#      other unpaid contributors.
# 5. The name of Geoff Kuenning may not be used to endorse or promote
#    products derived from this software without specific prior
#    written permission.
#
# THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY GEOFF KUENNING AND CONTRIBUTORS ``AS IS'' AND
# ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE
# IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE
# ARE DISCLAIMED.  IN NO EVENT SHALL GEOFF KUENNING OR CONTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE
# FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR CONSEQUENTIAL
# DAMAGES (INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS
# OR SERVICES; LOSS OF USE, DATA, OR PROFITS; OR BUSINESS INTERRUPTION)
# HOWEVER CAUSED AND ON ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, WHETHER IN CONTRACT, STRICT
# LIABILITY, OR TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE OR OTHERWISE) ARISING IN ANY WAY
# OUT OF THE USE OF THIS SOFTWARE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF
# SUCH DAMAGE.
#
#       Affix table for German
#
# This table is a another cut at a description of the common affixes found
# in the German language.  It is definitely not final.  This file should be
# considered as a strong suggestion and an example of how a proper affix file
# can be done.
# It is obvious from the experience of trying to build this file that a
# proper affix description must be done by a native speaker of the language;
# i.e. don't tinker with other peoples toys and tongues.
#
# It is also obvious that you better have some linguistic background,
# so teachers are welcome to join in!
#
# Some people (like me, Martin) try to do it without such a background and
# are having a hard time.  Have your "Duden" handy!
#
# Here's a record of flags used, in case you want to add new ones.
#
#            ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
# Used:      **************************
#            ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
# Available:
#
#
# [ Note: The flags   G, L, J, K, H and M   are the
#         least used for now and may eventually disappear. ]
#
#
# No particular settings for ispell are necessary --
# The default 32 MASKBITS for ispell are sufficient and
# you may use the same ispell for german and english.
#
# Here is a small example list of words.  You may enter
# them to "ispell -d some-german.hash -e" to see them expanded.
# ( The command
#       echo "qqqqq" > tmp; buildhash tmp -l german.aff some-german.hash
#   can build an empty german dictionary for you. )
#
# A"gypter/FSN
# a"hneln/WIXYD
# a"hnlich/AC
# a"lteste/A
# achtzigste/A
# arbeiten/WIXYD
# atmen/IXYD
# blasS/AC
# dehnen/WIXYBD
# eitel/AC
# fein/AC
# formbar/AC
# Freund/PESTF
# gelegen/L
# gemein/AC
# gesund/AU
# gewisS/AC
# gro"sSer/A
# gro"sSte/A
# grosS/A
# gru"sSen/WIXYD
# handeln/WIXYDV
# hasSte/Z
# hatte/Z
# heimlich/AC
# heisS/AC
# heisSen/WIX
# ka"lter/A
# ka"lteste/A
# kalt/A
# kaufen/WIXYDV
# KongresS/SQ
# la"cheln/WIXYD
# mies/AC
# nasS/AC
# neu/AC
# rasen/WIXYD
# rasten/WIXYD
# rechnen/WIXYD
# reiben/WIXYD
# rufen/WIXDG
# rund/AL
# sichern/WIXYB
# Spa"sSe/N
# sparsam/AC
# SpasS/ET
# spasSen/WIXYD
# teuer/AC
# trauern/XYD
# verkaufen/WIXYDO
# weisS/AC
# Wind/PEST
# winden/WIXD
# wissen/ID
# wu"sSte/Z
# wusSte/Z
#
# $Log: deutsch.7bit,v $
# Revision 1.7  1994/10/25  05:46:42  geoff
# Improve the way the A flag for adjectives handles rare words like
# "parallel"
#
# Revision 1.6  1994/09/01  06:06:46  geoff
# Add alternate forms for HP, Atari, and PC character sets.
#
# Revision 1.5  1994/08/31  05:58:45  geoff
# Fix a bug that could cause incorrect adjective affix formation on
# certain foreign words such as "parallel".
#
# Revision 1.4  1994/02/07  06:32:58  geoff
# Turn on compoundwords
#
# Revision 1.3  1994/01/25  07:12:31  geoff
# Get rid of all old RCS log lines in preparation for the 3.1 release.
#
#

compoundwords off
allaffixes on

# Character-set definitions.  The special-character strings are appropriate
# for use with the "-mm" nroff/troff macro package.  Users of other formatters
# or macro packages will undoubtedly have to modify these definitions.
# The definition of "ess-zed" requires that you define two characters in
# your ".mm" files;  "\*(ss" should expand to "\*b" (the Greek beta, which
# is fairly close to ess-zed) and "\*(SS" should expand to "SS" (two capital
# esses).
#
# These definitions also illustrate a cute little trick.  By declaring the
# non-special string 'ss' as a stringchar, we cause ispell to represent it
# as a single character internally.  This allows ispell to suggest spellings
# that use ess-zed as corrections for spellings using double esses, which is
# good because this is a common spelling error.  The price we pay is that
# ispell will not generate proper corrections for less common typos such
# as "st" for "ss".

#
# generic umlauts and sz as used in german word list
# All other types are defined relative to this one.
#
defstringtype "list" "nroff" ".list"

wordchars       a       A
stringchar      „       Ž
wordchars       [b-o]   [B-O]
stringchar      ”       ™
wordchars       [p-s]   [P-S]
stringchar      á       # SS
stringchar      ss      SS
stringchar      sS      # SS
wordchars       [tu]    [TU]
stringchar             š
wordchars       [v-z]   [V-Z]

#
#                       Quick Reference
#                       ===============
#
# nouns and adjectives:
#       E   -e                  A  adj.: -e,-er,-en,-em,-es
#       N   -n
#       P   -en                 C  adj. comp.:  -ere, -erer, -eren, ...
#       R   -er, -ern                           -ste, -ster, -sten, ...
#       S   -s,-es
#       T   -es                 D  verb > adj.: -d,   -de,  -den,
#       Q   -s > sse,ssen                       -dem, -der, -des
#
# verbs:
#       W   Du-imperative form                  holen  > hol
#       I   ich- and ihr-form present tense     nehmen > nehme, nehmt
#       X   other present tense forms           legen  > legst, legt
#       Y   past tense forms                    wagen  > wagte, wagtest, ...
#       Z   past tense and conditional forms from ich-from
#           e.g.  nahm > nahmen, nahmst, nahmt
#       O   Partizip: -tete, -teter, tetes, teten, tetem
#
# other suffixes:
#       L   -lich, -liche, -licher, ...
#       B   -bar, -bare, -barer, ...
#       J   -ung, -ungen, ...
#       M   -chen, -chens
#
# prefixes and msic. suffixes:
#       U  un-                  F   -in,   -innen
#       G  ge-                  H   -heit, -heiten
#       V  ver-                 K   -keit, -keiten

prefixes

flag G:         # Inseparable ge- prefix for verbs
    .                   >       GE              # Wie rufen     > gerufen

flag *U:        # un- prefix for anything
    .                   >       UN              # Wie gesund    > ungesund

flag *V:        # Inseparable ver- prefix for verbs
    .                   >       VER             # Wie kaufen    > verkaufen

suffixes

flag F:         # IN, INNEN for feminizing nouns and NEN for xxxIN nouns
    I N                 >       NEN             # Wie Ba"uerin  > Ba"uerinnen
    E                   >       -E,IN           #     Bote      > Botin
    E                   >       -E,INNEN        #     Bote      > Botinnen
    [^I] N              >       IN              #     Freund    > Freundin
    [^I] N              >       INNEN           #     Freund    > Freundinnen
    [^EN]               >       IN
    [^EN]               >       INNEN

# The question is: How to switch Capitalization off?
# This will not serve us much otherwise!
flag L:         # LICHxx for creating adverbs and adjectives:
    N                   >       TLICH           # Wie Wesen     > wesentlich
    N                   >       TLICHE          #     rund      > rundliche
    N                   >       TLICHER         #     Wesen     > wesentlicher
    N                   >       TLICHES         #     Wesen     > wesentliches
    N                   >       TLICHEM         #     Wesen     > wesentlichem
    N                   >       TLICHEN         #     Wesen     > wesentlichen
    [^N]                >       LICH            #     Kind      > kindlich
    [^N]                >       LICHE           #     Kind      > kindliche
    [^N]                >       LICHER          #     Kind      > kindlicher
    [^N]                >       LICHES          #     Kind      > kindliches
    [^N]                >       LICHEM          #     Kind      > kindlichem
    [^N]                >       LICHEN          #     Kind      > kindlichen

#
# How to force Capitals on for heit/keit ?
#
flag H:         # HEIT substantivation:
    .                   >       HEIT            # Wie gemein    > Gemeinheit
    .                   >       HEITEN          #     fein      > Feinheiten

flag K:         # KEIT substantivation:
    .                   >       KEIT            # Wie heimlich  > Heimlichkeit
    .                   >       KEITEN          #     eitel     > Eitelkeiten

flag M:         # CHEN diminuitiv:
    .                   >       CHEN            # Tu"r          > Tu"rchen
    .                   >       CHENS           # Heft          > Heftchens
